Hawaii, session 2026, HB559.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that financial education is a lifelong learning process that empowers individuals to plan for their futures. Historically, the education system has assumed that students learn important financial skills from their families. However, not all students are being taught the financial skills they will need to be successful later in life. The legislature also finds that a lack of financial literacy poses a significant barrier for individuals seeking to achieve financial prosperity and stability. Personal financial education is essential to ensure that Hawaii's youth are prepared to manage money, credit, and debt, and to become responsible workers, heads of households, investors, entrepreneurs, business leaders, and citizens. The legislature further finds that it is of the utmost importance to educate Hawaii's youth in economic and financial matters to prepare them for financial independence through the development of fiscal responsibility and financial management skills. Therefore, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of education to include the teaching of financial literacy in the existing personal transition plan course requirement. SECTION 2. Commencing with the 2027-2028 school year, the department of education shall require the teaching of financial literacy to be included in the existing personal transition plan requirement for each student.  A school may provide financial literacy systematically in the school program or develop its financial literacy program based on the school's stakeholder input on the scope and sequence of its personal transition plan. For purposes of this section, "financial literacy" includes but is not limited to curricula addressing financial skills, personal financial management, budgeting, debt, credit, and tax planning. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________